lexc-files/intermediate/N.txt
!--------
LEXICON N 
!--------
[N]:  NounInflAIU;
[N]:  NounInflAIU;
[N]:  NounInflGWGHW;
[N]:  NounInflWeakGH;
[N]:  NounInflStrongGH;
[N]:  NounInflMarkedStrongGH;
[N]:  NounInflTE;
[N]:  NounInflHopSemiFinalE;
[N]:  NounInflNoHopSemiFinalE;
[N]:  NounInflHopFinalE;
[N]:  NounInflNoHopFinalE;
